Louisiana, session 2026, SB43.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 1 of Title 28 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 28:211 and 212, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. ALTERNATIVE THERAPIES
§211. Psychedelic-assisted therapy; clinical studies
A. For purposes of this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Academic health center" means an organization that has a medical
school, one or more other health professional schools or programs, and one or
more affiliated teaching hospitals.
(2) "Drug developer" means a pharmaceutical company, biotechnology
company, or contract development and manufacturing organization engaged in
drug development and manufacturing.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 43 ENROLLED
(3) "Ibogaine" means ibogaine and ibogaine-based therapeutics,
including ibogaine analogs.
(4) "Psychedelic medication" means ibogaine, ibogaine-based
therapeutics, ibogaine analogs, MDMA, psilocybin, psilocybin-based
therapeutics, and mechanistically-similar analogs.
(5) "Psychedelic-assisted therapy" means an intervention that includes
the administration of a psychedelic medication to an individual in a controlled
clinical setting and manualized, trauma-informed preparatory and integrative
psychotherapy delivered by a qualified therapist to the individual before and
after administration of the psychedelic medication.
B. There is hereby established within the Louisiana Department of
Health, office of behavioral health, the Psychedelic-Assisted Therapy Initiative.
The purpose of the initiative shall be all of the following:
(1) To identify academic health centers that are conducting clinical
studies and clinical trial-enabling studies for the use of psychedelic-assisted
therapy for the treatment of opioid use disorders, co-occurring substance use
disorders, and treatment-resistant neurological or mental health conditions.
(2) To utilize the human service districts and authorities to identify
eligible patients to participate in the program.
(3) To provide information to parishes on utilizing opioid settlement
funds to enroll eligible patients residing in the parish to participate in the
studies or to support clinical trial-enabling studies that allow for the initiation
of clinical trials that may enroll patients who reside in the parish.
(4) To designate a state point of contact to coordinate with federal
agencies and other states with regard to psychedelic-assisted therapy and
related drug development.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall maintain a record of all
academic health centers participating in the program.
D. Each participating academic health center shall maintain
documentation ensuring compliance with state and federal regulations,
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 43 ENROLLED
including all of the following:
(1) Ensuring that the clinical study will be conducted in accordance with
a United States Food and Drug Administration investigational new drug
application, expanded access program, or other federally authorized pathway.
(2) Ensuring that any study will be conducted on-site in a hospital, clinic,
or research unit affiliated with the academic center, with confirmation of
appropriate trial liability insurance coverage.
(3) Maintaining a United States Drug Enforcement Agency Schedule I
research registration and any required state controlled substance registration.
(4) Obtaining Institutional Review Board approval for the clinical study.
(5) A clinical study protocol that includes all of the following:
(a) The study design, inclusion and exclusion criteria, objectives and
endpoints, eligible patient visit schedule, and schedule of follow-up assessments.
(b) Informed consent procedures and participant safeguards.
(c) Data security and privacy protections, including for personal
information.
(6) A drug administration plan for the clinical study that includes all of
the following:
(a) The investigational drug product description, source, formulation,
route of administration, and dosing regimen.
(b) A clinical staffing model and monitoring procedures for the
administration of the investigational drug.
(c) Discharge criteria and transportation procedures for participants
after psychedelic-assisted therapy.
(d) Procedures for the storage, handling, chain of custody, and disposal
of controlled substances, and an accountability plan for violations of the
procedures.
(7) A safety monitoring and risk management plan for the clinical study
that includes all of the following:
(a) Medical and psychiatric screening procedures.
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 43 ENROLLED
(b) On-site emergency response procedures.
(c) Adverse event and serious adverse event capture and reporting
timelines.
(d) Predefined rules for pausing or stopping the clinical study.
(8) A fidelity plan for the clinical study that includes all of the following:
(a) Clinician licensure and qualification requirements.
(b) A training, supervision, and fidelity monitoring plan.
(c) Ethical safeguards and a participant complaint and grievance
process.
E. Each academic health center may utilize the human service districts
and authorities to identify eligible participants for the clinical studies. Eligible
participants include individuals with opioid use disorders, co-occurring
substance use disorders, and treatment-resistant neurological or mental health
conditions.
F.(1) The academic health centers shall coordinate with parishes to
utilize opioid settlement funds to enroll eligible patients residing in the parish
to participate in the studies.
(2) In addition to utilization of opioid settlement funds, the department
may seek and receive voluntary monies from any sources, including federal
funds, gifts, grants, and donations, which shall be expended for the purposes
provided for in this Section.
(3) To the extent feasible, the Louisiana Department of Health shall
support and encourage the use of opioid settlement funds and other related
monies as matching funds for federal or other external funding opportunities
in support of Louisiana trial and trial-enabling studies.
G. No later than January first of each year, each academic health center
participating in the program shall submit a progress report to the Louisiana
Department of Health on clinical studies conducted by the academic health
center. The Louisiana Department of Health shall determine the data required
for inclusion in the report. The Louisiana Department of Health shall prepare
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 43 ENROLLED
a compiled report of the data received from participating academic health
centers and submit the report to the legislature by March first of each year.
H. To the extent feasible, participating academic health centers shall
coordinate with other states that are conducting clinical trials for use of
psychedelic-assisted therapy.
§212. Drug development of ibogaine and psychedelic medication treatments
A. An academic health center may enter into an agreement with a drug
developer to establish a consortium for the purpose of conducting drug
development clinical trials with ibogaine and psychedelic medication treatments
and securing the United States Food and Drug Administration's approval of
such treatments for the treatment of opioid use disorder, co-occurring
substance use disorder, and any other neurological or mental health condition
for which the treatments demonstrate efficacy.
B. A consortium seeking to conduct a drug development clinical trial
may do all of the following:
(1) Submit an investigational new drug application to the United States
Food and Drug Administration in accordance with 21 CFR Part 312.
(2) Seek a breakthrough therapy designation from the United States
Food and Drug Administration in accordance with 21 U.S.C. 356.
(3) Enter into an agreement with a consortium established by the
government of another state, whether acting through an agent or joint venture,
that has taken both of the following actions:
(a) Has submitted an investigational new drug application to the United
States Food and Drug Administration in accordance with 21 CFR Part 312.
(b) Has requested a breakthrough therapy designation for ibogaine from
the United States Food and Drug Administration in accordance with 21 U.S.C.
356.
(4) Work with the United States Food and Drug Administration to
coordinate the drug development trial in Louisiana with drug development
trials that are being conducted in other states.
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 43 ENROLLED
C.(1) Any revenue attributable to newly developed intellectual property
and other commercial rights arising from trial-enabling and drug development
clinical trial activity conducted by a consortium pursuant to this Section, during
the period for which the trials are funded, and any following period of
commercialization shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Not less than a two and one-half percent of net sales running royalty
to the state.
(b) The remainder to the members of the consortium in the amounts
specified by written agreement of the members.
(2) Intellectual property and other commercial rights arising from the
drug development clinical trials conducted pursuant to this Section shall include
any of the following as related to the trials:
(a) Intellectual property, technology, and inventions.
(b) Patents, trademarks, and licenses.
(c) Proprietary and confidential information.
(d) Trade secrets, data, and databases.
(e) Tools, methods, and processes.
(f) Treatment models or techniques.
(g) Administration protocols.
(h) Works of authorship.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.